Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 15 SPORTS BETTING
44-30-1507. Records - confidentiality - exceptions.

Except as specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, information and records of the commission enumerated by this section are confidential and may not be disclosed except pursuant to a court order. No person may by subpoena or statutory authority obtain such information or records. Information and records considered confidential include:

Tax returns of individual licensees;

Credit reports and security reports and procedures of applicants and other persons seeking to do business or doing business with the commission;

Audit work papers, worksheets, and auditing procedures used by the commission, its agents, or employees; and

Investigative reports concerning violations of law or concerning the backgrounds of licensees, applicants, or other persons prepared by division investigators or investigators from other agencies working with the commission and any work papers related to the reports; except that the commission may, in its sole discretion, disclose so much of the reports or work papers as it deems necessary and prudent.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to requests for information or records described in subsection (1) of this section from the governor, attorney general, state auditor, any of the respective district attorneys of this state, or any federal or state law enforcement agency, or for the use of the information or records by the executive director, director, or commission for official purposes, or by employees of the division or the department in the performance of their authorized and official duties.

This section does not make confidential the aggregate tax collections during any reporting period, the names and businesses of licensees, or figures showing the aggregate amount of money bet during any reporting period. The division shall publicly report this information on a monthly basis in statements of net sports betting proceeds and sports betting taxes. Public reporting shall be made electronically and posted on the division's website.

The division shall publicly report monthly and annual net sports betting proceeds, aggregated on a city-by-city basis for the city of Cripple Creek, the city of Central, and the city of Black Hawk, based on the physical location of master licensees' casinos. The data must also contain subtotals for proceeds derived from on-site and internet sports betting operations, respectively. To the extent partial-year data are available for any reporting period that preceded January 1, 2022, the division shall report any available monthly figures and shall note that annual figures do not reflect activity during the entire reporting period.

If there are fewer than three holders of active and valid sports betting licenses in any of the cities listed in subsection (3)(b)(I) of this section, then, to protect the licensees' privacy, the division shall aggregate that city's sports betting proceeds with the sports betting proceeds of the city that has the next lowest number of active and valid sports betting licensees.

If the Gilpin county assessor or Teller county assessor uses information aggregated pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(II) of this section to establish the actual value of a casino, whether sports betting is offered on the premises of the casino or online by the casino or by a contractor, and the use of the aggregated information results in an increase in the actual value of the casino's real property, the county assessor or an authorized agent of the assessor shall:

Present the county assessor's estimate of the increase in the casino's valuation, based on the aggregated data, to the taxpayer on or before March 1 of each revaluation year;

Consider any information that the taxpayer, in its discretion, chooses to disclose and provides to the county assessor or authorized agent of the assessor on or before March 15 of the revaluation year tending to show that the value attributed to the casino based on the aggregated data is incorrect;

Treat any such disclosure by the taxpayer as the proprietary and confidential information of the taxpayer and shall not reveal the information to any other person, notwithstanding any provision of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, or any other law. The confidentiality created by this subsection (3)(b)(III)(C) applies at all times during the real property assessment process, beginning when the information is first provided to the county assessor or authorized agent of the assessor and continuing through county board of equalization proceedings, any protest process, any board of assessment appeal proceedings, and any court proceedings. To the extent this information is the subject of administrative or court proceedings, the discussion of the information shall not be public and shall be restricted to in camera proceedings under seal.

Only use such aggregated information or information provided by the taxpayer that establishes income actually received by the casino because the casino conducts sports betting on its licensed premises, either directly or by contracting with a licensed sports betting operator; or contracts with a third party so that the third party may conduct a licensed online sports betting operation in conjunction with the casino's master license.

Nothing in this subsection (3)(b) authorizes the division to produce any document or information that directly discloses, or would indirectly result in the disclosure of, taxpayer information that is confidential under this article 30 or any other provision of law.

A person who discloses confidential records or information in violation of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. A criminal prosecution pursuant to this section must be brought within five years after the date the violation occurred.

If a person violating this section is an officer or employee of the state, in addition to any other penalties or sanctions, the person is subject to dismissal if the procedures in section 24-50-125 are followed.

A person is liable for treble damages to an injured party in a civil action the subject of which includes the release of confidential records or information, if the person violating this section is a current employee or officer of the state who obtained the confidential records or information specified in subsection (1) of this section during his or her employment.

A former employee or officer is liable for treble damages to an injured party in a civil action the subject of which includes the release of records or information after leaving state employment if the person violating this section is a former employee or officer of the state who obtained the confidential records or information during his or her employment and the person executed a written statement with the state agreeing to be held to the confidentiality standards expressed in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3227, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1292), ch. 466, p. 3357, § 2, effective January 1, 2022; (4)(a) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3330, § 797, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1292, see section 1 of chapter 466, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

44-30-1508. Sports betting tax - rules.

There is hereby imposed a tax on sports betting activity, at the rate of ten percent of net sports betting proceeds. The commission shall establish by rule the form and manner in which the tax is collected.

All proceeds of the sports betting tax shall be forwarded to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the sports betting fund created in section 44-30-1509.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3228, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

44-30-1509. Sports betting fund - wagering revenue recipients hold-harmless fund - creation - rules - definitions - repeal.

There is hereby created, in the state treasury, the sports betting fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The initial appropriation to the division for sports betting regulation and all subsequent revenues of the division derived from sports betting activity and the regulation of fantasy contest operators under part 16 of this article 30, including license fees, fines and penalties, and collection of the sports betting tax, shall be deposited into the fund. All expenses of the division related to sports betting and fantasy contest regulation, including the expenses of investigation and prosecution relating to sports betting and the regulation of fantasy contest operators, shall be paid from the fund.

All money paid into the fund is continuously appropriated for the purposes of implementing this part 15 and part 16 of this article 30. Payment shall be made upon proper presentation of a voucher prepared by the commission in accordance with other statutes governing payments of liabilities incurred on behalf of the state and shall not be conditioned on any appropriation by the general assembly. Receipt of the payment constitutes spending authority by the division.

From the money in the sports betting fund, to the extent the unexpended and unencumbered balance in the fund so permits, the state treasurer shall:

First, transfer an amount to the general fund to repay any appropriation made from the general fund for the commission's and division's startup costs, including initial licensing and rule-making, related to sports betting;

Second, pay all ongoing expenses related to administering this part 15 incurred by the commission, the department, the division, and any other state agency from whom assistance related to the administration of this part 15 is requested by the commission or the director, as determined in accordance with rules of the commission. When making distributions from the fund as described in this subsection (2), the state treasurer may withhold an amount reasonably anticipated to be sufficient to pay the expenses until the next annual distribution.

Third, transfer an amount equal to six percent of the full fiscal year sports betting tax revenues to the wagering revenue recipients hold-harmless fund, referred to in this section as the "hold-harmless fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury, from which the state treasurer shall make disbursements as directed by the commission as follows:

The commission shall accept applications from the following persons and entities for annual, lump-sum payments to offset any loss of revenue that they can demonstrate, to the commission's satisfaction, is attributable to sports betting:

The state historical fund created by section 9 (5)(b)(II) of article XVIII of the state constitution;

The colleges described in section 44-30-702 (4)(a);

The cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek;

The counties of Gilpin and Teller; and

Any persons or entities who benefit from purse funds collected pursuant to section 44-32-702 (1)(c) or 44-32-705.

The commission shall establish, by rule, an annual schedule for the acceptance of applications; the form and manner in which applications must be made; its criteria for verifying the amount of each applicant's revenue loss attributable to sports betting; and the date on which distributions from the hold-harmless fund are to be made.

If, on the annual date of distribution, there is not sufficient money in the hold-harmless fund to pay all verified losses, the commission shall direct the state treasurer to reduce the amount of all claims by a uniform percentage so that applicants receive a share of the money proportionate to their verified losses.

On December 31, 2023, and on December 31 of each year thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer any money credited to the hold-harmless fund and not disbursed within two years after the date on which the money is credited to the hold-harmless fund, as authorized by the commission, to the responsible gaming grant program cash fund created in section 44-30-1702 (8).

Fourth, transfer one hundred thirty thousand dollars annually to the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, to be used as follows:

Thirty thousand dollars for the operation of a crisis hotline for gamblers by Rocky Mountain Crisis Partners or its successor organization; and

One hundred thousand dollars for prevention, education, treatment, and workforce development by, and including the payment of salaries of, counselors certified in the treatment of gambling disorders.

This subsection (2)(d) is repealed, effective December 31, 2023.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(e) is effective until January 1, 2024.] Fifth, transfer all remaining unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund to the water plan implementation cash fund created in section 37-60-123.3.

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(e) is effective January 1, 2024.

]

Fourth, transfer all remaining unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund to the water plan implementation cash fund created in section 37-60-123.3.

Nothing in this section permits compounding or accumulation of the annual adjustment.

Upon request, the state treasurer shall report to the director or the commission the amount of money available in the fund. The director shall certify all accounts and expenditures from the fund. The state treasurer shall pay upon warrants drawn by the controller. The controller is authorized as directed to draw warrants payable out of the fund upon vouchers properly certified.

The state treasurer shall invest the money in the fund so long as the money is timely available to pay the expenses of the division. Investments must be those otherwise permitted by state law, and interest or any other return on the investments shall be paid into the fund.

The division shall be operated so that, after the initial state appropriation, its administration of this part 15 and part 16 of this article 30 is financially self-sustaining.

No claim for the payment of any expense of the division relating to administering this part 15 or part 16 of this article 30 can be made unless it is against the fund. No other money of the state shall be used or obligated to pay the expenses of the division or commission related to sports betting or fantasy sports activity.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3228, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(1), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 20-1286), ch. 269, p. 1311, § 4, effective July 10.

L. 2022:

IP(2)(d) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1582, § 210, effective July 1; (2)(c)(IV) added and (2)(d) amended, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2866, § 3, effective August 10; (2)(e) amended, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2866, § 3, effective January 1, 2024.

44-30-1510. Audits.

The sports betting fund shall be audited at least once before May 1, 2022, and at least once every five years thereafter, by or under the direction of the state auditor, who, notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), shall submit a report of the audit to the legislative audit committee. The expenses of the audit shall be paid from the sports betting fund.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3230, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

44-30-1511. Unlawful acts.

In addition to the prohibitions in section 44-30-801, it is unlawful for any person:

To charge, in connection with the placement or acceptance of a bet, a commission or fee greater than or less than that fixed by the commission;

To accept a bet by any person under twenty-one years of age; or

To accept a bet at any place or in any manner other than a place or manner authorized and specified in a sports betting license.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3230, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

44-30-1512. Penalties.

In addition to any other penalties that may apply, a person violating section 44-30-1511 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person violating the acceptance of bets restrictions of section 44-30-1511 (1)(b) may also be prosecuted pursuant to section 18-6-701 for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

A person purporting to issue, suspend, revoke, or renew licenses pursuant to this part 15 or to procure or influence the issuance, suspension, revocation, or renewal of a license for any personal pecuniary gain or any thing of value, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(r), or a person violating section 44-30-1502 commits a class 3 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

A person violating any provision of this part 15 relating to disclosure by providing false or misleading information commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3231, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

44-30-1513. Other laws inapplicable.

Any other state or local law in conflict with this part 15 is inapplicable, but this section does not supersede or affect part 6 of article 21 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3231, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Section 16(2) of chapter 347 (HB 19-1327), Session Laws of Colorado 2019, provides that this section takes effect May 1, 2020, only if, at the November 2019 statewide election, a majority of voters approve the ballot question submitted pursuant to § 44-30-1514. That ballot question, referred to the registered electors as proposition DD, was approved on November 5, 2019, and was proclaimed by the Governor on December 20, 2019. The vote count for the measure was as follows:

FOR: :u800 800,745

AGAINST: :u800 756,712

44-30-1514. Approval by electors - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3231, § 12, effective May 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3231.)

44-30-1515. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3231, § 12, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective May 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3231.)

44-30-1516. Duties of licensees under the gambling payment intercept act.

[

Editor's note: This section is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Before making a payment of cash winnings, a licensee shall comply with the requirements of article 33 of this title 44.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2876, § 11, effective July 1, 2023.